Massachusetts, session 194th, H2968.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, subsection (g)
of section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the words “Cushing hospital” in lines 265 and 266 the
following:-
"all full time dispatchers, dispatch supervisors, communications center directors or
communications chiefs certified by the commonwealth of Massachusetts State 911 Department
as certified telecommunicators, as defined by MA 560 CMR 5.04"
of 1